California statutes. Water Code
The project assessment, or any installment thereof, shall be and remain a lien on the lands in the same manner as, and shall be part of, the annual district assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75461.

The district shall issue warrants for the amount of the project assessment, which warrants shall be made payable in the amount and at times corresponding substantially to the payments of the installments of the project assessment, plus any money to be paid from funds secured by assessments for general district purposes as provided in Section 75411, and which warrants shall bear interest at such rate of interest as may have been fixed in the levy of the project assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75462.

Such warrants shall be payable only out of funds derived from the levy and collection of the project assessment and, if so stated in the resolution proposing the project, from the assessments made for general district purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75463.

The proceeds arising from the sale of the warrants shall be paid into the treasury of the district and placed to the credit of a special project fund and expended only for the purpose for which the project assessment was authorized to be levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. (Multiple Versions) [75470. - 75478.5.]

75470.

The Central San Joaquin Water Conservation District, in addition to its other powers, may fix and collect charges as provided in this chapter.

As used in this chapter, “district” means the Central San Joaquin Water Conservation District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.   Superseded on operative date of amendment by Stats. 2009, Ch. 514.)
-------------------------------------------

75470.

(a) The Eastern San Joaquin County Water District, in addition to its other powers, may fix
 and collect charges as provided in this chapter.

(b) As used in this chapter, “district” means the Eastern San Joaquin County Water District.

(c) If the board has complied with the procedures set forth in this chapter, as it read at the time charges were established pursuant to Sections 75471 and 75471.5, the board may, by resolution, continue to collect the charges in successive years at the same rate, consistent with Article XIII D of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 514, Sec. 3.   (AB 1172)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Operative on date prescribed by Sec. 6 of Ch. 514.)
-------------------------------------------

75470.5.

On or before the 30th day of June of each year, the district may, by resolution of the board, fix and collect charges sufficient to meet and pay the estimated expenses and obligations, including a reasonable reserve for contingencies, of the district, until the time that money shall be available to the district from charges fixed in the next succeeding year, subject, however, to a maximum limit of two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) upon each acre of taxable land within the district.

The board, in fixing the charges, may establish the dates of delinquency and may impose penalties for delinquency not exceeding 10
 percent of the amount of the charge and may, in addition, collect interest at the rate of 8 percent per annum from the date of delinquency on all delinquent charges. The district may sue for the recovery of unpaid charges.

The revenue obtained from the charges may be used for any district purpose and the payment of any district obligation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75471.

The board, in fixing the charges pursuant to Section 75470.5, shall fix a uniform charge per acre on each acre of taxable land within the district sufficient to pay its estimated expenses and obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75471.5.

If the charge for any parcel of land separately charged, based on the rate fixed pursuant to Section 75471, is less than ten dollars ($10), a minimum charge may be set by the board which shall not exceed ten dollars ($10) for each separately charged parcel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75472.

The district may, by resolution of the board, provide a procedure for and collect the charges by way of the tax bills of the county in which the district is located. The charges shall appear as a separate item on the tax bill, shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county ad valorem property taxes are collected, and shall be subject to the same penalties and the same procedure and sale in case of delinquency as provided for those taxes.

The district shall, on or before August 1st of each year, certify to the county auditor the charges to be collected. The county may deduct from the revenue so
 collected for the district an appropriate amount for the billing and collection services rendered to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75473.

Any charge erroneously made by reason of inadvertence or clerical mistake may be refunded upon order of the board at any time after payment thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75474.

The board shall annually fix and collect a charge, as provided in Section 75471, until the board, on its own motion or on petition of landowners representing at least 25 percent of the land within the district or at least 25 percent of the voters of the district, directs that commissioners be named to make a determination of the benefits received and to establish one or more zones of benefit which shall reflect the proportion of benefits to be derived by the lands within the respective zone or zones from the operation of the district and from any contract the district may have entered into. The determination shall be effective as of the first day of July in
 the next succeeding year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75475.

The board, pursuant to Section 75474, shall thereafter appoint three commissioners who have no interest in any real property within the district, each of whom, before entering upon his or her duties, shall make and subscribe an oath that he or she is not in any manner interested in any real property within the district, directly or indirectly, and that he or she will perform the duties of a commissioner to the best of his or her abilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75475.5.

The commissioners shall determine whether the district should be divided into more than one zone of benefit.

If the commissioners determine that the district shall be divided into more than one zone, the zones shall be given a numerical designation starting with Zone 1, which shall be the zone which receives the greatest proportional benefit. The benefit received by Zone 1 shall be assessed at 100 percent, and the benefit received by the other zones shall be expressed in terms of relatively smaller percentages as the benefits compare with those received by Zone 1.

The
 commissioners shall prepare a map showing the boundaries of the zones and their respective benefit percentages, and a report explaining the basis for their determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75476.

Upon receipt of the commissioners’ map and report, the board shall schedule a hearing thereon. Notice of the hearing shall be given in each county in which the district is located by publishing once each week for at least two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75476.5.

The notice shall state the time and place of hearing, that the purpose of the hearing is to approve the report and map of the commissioners, and the location of the place or places where the report and map may be inspected. The notice shall include a brief, generalized description of the benefit zones and percentage of benefits determined for each zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75477.

At the hearing, any landowner within the proposed boundaries of the benefit zone or other interested person may offer any relevant evidence or testimony relating to the boundaries of the benefit zones or the benefits to be received. The landowner or interested person may object the inclusion of land within a benefit zone or may request the inclusion of any other land within the zone or a change in the percentage of benefits of any zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75477.5.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the board may alter the boundaries of benefit zones or the percentages of benefits applicable thereto and shall make an order establishing the boundaries of the benefit zones and the percentages of benefits applicable thereto which shall best approximate the benefits received.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75478.

Upon an order that the district be divided into more than one zone, the charge per acre made pursuant to Section 75471 shall be multiplied by the percentage of benefit applicable to the zone or zones within which the acreage is located, and shall then be increased by the factor necessary so that the total amount to be collected shall be equal to the amount determined to be required pursuant to Section 75470.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75478.5.

The board, subsequent to any redetermination of benefits made pursuant to Section 75474, may, on its own motion or on petition of landowners representing at least 25 percent of the lands within the district or at least 25 percent of the voters of the district, direct that the zones of benefit or that the percentages of benefit be further redetermined in the same manner as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. North San Joaquin Water Conservation District [75480. - 75481.5.]

75480.

(a) The North San Joaquin Water Conservation District, in addition to its other powers, may levy assessments as provided in this chapter.

(b) “District,” for the purposes of this chapter, means the North San Joaquin Water Conservation District.

(c) “Collected water” and “water that is collected,” for the purposes of this chapter, means the net acre-feet of water caused to be deposited onto land by the district. In determining the amount of collected water, both the amount of water entering the water system and the amount of water leaving the water system, having not been applied, shall be measured. The amount of water that leaves the system, having not been applied, shall be subtracted from the amount of water that enters the system. The difference shall be reduced by the amount of water lost due to evaporation and further reduced for water subject to export from the district. The sum difference is the amount of collected water.

(d) “Applied,” for the purposes of this chapter, means that the water has been used for irrigation, recharge, in lieu of flooding, deposited into an area for storage, or held in an area for percolation purposes.

(e) “System,” for the purposes of this chapter, means all of the physical apparatus owned, operated, or maintained by the district for the purpose of moving or holding water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 316.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

75480.5.

(a) The North San Joaquin Water Conservation District may fix and collect assessments upon taxable land within the district on which surface water or groundwater is applied or delivered. Assessments may not be imposed on dry pastureland or other agricultural land on which neither groundwater nor surface water is applied or delivered.

(b) The maximum amount of the assessments levied by the district shall be determined on a year-by-year basis, dependent on the amount of water that is collected by the district during the previous year, consistent with this section. The district shall determine the amount of collected water.

(c) The revenue obtained from the assessments shall be used for the purposes of groundwater recharge, the delivery of surface water, and any related expenses incurred by the district. The district may, by resolution of the board, fix and collect assessments sufficient to meet and pay the estimated expenses and obligations authorized by this subdivision, including a reasonable reserve for contingencies. No assessment may be imposed on any parcel that exceeds the reasonable cost of the proportional special benefit conferred on that parcel.

(d) The assessments shall be fixed by the district on or before the 31st day of July in accordance with subdivisions (e) and (f).

(e) (1) During the years 2003, 2004, 2005, and 2006, the district may assess no more than one dollar ($1) per acre or portion of an acre, unless the district has collected 5,000 acre-feet or more of water, during the previous year.

(2) If the district has collected at least 5,000 acre-feet, but less than 8,000 acre-feet, of water during the previous year, then the district may assess up to two dollars ($2) per acre or portion of an acre.

(3) If the district has collected at least 8,000 acre-feet, but less than 10,000 acre-feet, of water during the previous year, then the district may assess up to three dollars ($3) per acre or portion of an acre.

(4) If the district has collected at least 10,000 acre-feet, but less than 12,000 acre-feet, of water during the previous year, the district may assess up to four dollars ($4) per acre or portion of an acre.

(5) If the district has collected 12,000 acre-feet or more of water during the previous year, the district may assess up to five dollars ($5) per acre or portion of an acre. The district may not assess more than five dollars ($5) per acre, or portion of an acre, of taxable land within the district on which surface water or groundwater is applied or delivered.

(f) (1) For the year 2007, and each subsequent year, if the district has collected at least 3,000 acre-feet, but less than 5,000 acre-feet, of water during the previous year, then the district may assess up to one dollar ($1) per acre or portion of an acre.

(2) If the district has collected at least 5,000 acre-feet, but less than 8,000 acre-feet, of water during the previous year, then the district may assess up to two dollars ($2) per acre or portion of an acre.

(3) If the district has collected at least 8,000 acre-feet, but less than 10,000 acre-feet, of water during the previous year, then the district may assess up to three dollars ($3) per acre or portion of an acre.

(4) If the district has collected at least 10,000 acre-feet, but less than 12,000 acre-feet, of water during the previous year, the district may assess up to four dollars ($4) per acre or portion of an acre.

(5) If the district has collected 12,000 acre-feet or more of water during the previous year, the district may assess up to five dollars ($5) per acre or portion of an acre. The district may not assess more than five dollars ($5) per acre, or portion of an acre, of taxable land within the district on which surface water or groundwater is applied or delivered.

(g) The board, in levying the charges, may establish the dates of delinquency and may impose penalties for delinquency not exceeding 10 percent of the amount of the assessment and may, in addition, collect interest at the rate of 8 percent per annum from the date of delinquency on all delinquent assessments. The district may sue for the recovery of unpaid assessments.

(h) Any assessment levied pursuant to this chapter shall be imposed consistent with Article XIIIC and Article XIIID of the California Constitution and the Proposition 218 Omnibus Implementation Act (Chapter 38 of the Statutes of 1997), and any amendments thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 318, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

75481.

(a) The district may, by resolution of the board, provide a procedure for and collect the assessments by way of the tax bills of the county in which the district is located. The assessments shall appear as a separate item on the tax bill, shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county ad valorem property taxes are collected, and shall be subject to the same procedures, including sale in case of default, as are provided for those taxes.

(b) The district shall, on or before August l of each year, certify to the county auditor the assessments to be collected. The county may deduct from the revenue so collected for the district, an appropriate amount for the billing and collection services provided to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 318, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

75481.5.

Any assessments erroneously made by reason of inadvertence or clerical mistake may be refunded upon order of the board at any time after payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 318, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 9. GROUND WATER CHARGE [75500. - 75642.]



  CHAPTER 1. In General [75500. - 75524.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [75500. - 75508.]

75500.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this article shall govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75501.

“Person” or “operator” means public agencies, federal, state, and local, private corporations, firms, partnerships, limited liability companies, individuals, or groups of individuals, whether legally organized or not. “Owner” or “operator” also means the person to whom a water-producing facility is assessed by the county assessor of an affected county, or, if not separately assessed, the person who owns the land upon which a water-producing facility is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 228.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

75502.

“Ground water” means all water beneath the earth’s surface, but does not include water which is produced with oil in the production of oil and gas, or in a bona fide mining operation, or during construction operations, or from gravity or artesian springs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75502.5.

Notwithstanding Sections 75500 and 75502, for purposes of the United Water Conservation District, “groundwater” means all water beneath the earth’s surface, but does not include water that is produced with oil in the production of oil and gas, in a bona fide mining operation, during construction operations, or from gravity or natural springs. For the purpose of this section, “groundwater” includes water produced from artesian wells.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 833, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

75503.

“Production” or “producing” means the act of extracting ground water by pumping or otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75504.

“Water-producing facility” means any device or method, mechanical or otherwise, for the production of water from the ground water supplies within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75505.

“Accumulated overdraft” means the amount of water necessary to be replaced in the intake areas of the ground water basins within the district or any zone or zones thereof to prevent the landward movement of salt water into the fresh ground water body, or to prevent subsidence of the land within the district or any zone or zones thereof, as determined by the board from time to time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75506.

“Annual overdraft” means the amount, determined by the board, by which the production of water from ground water supplies within the district or any zone or zones thereof during the water year exceeds the natural replenishment of such ground water supplies in such water year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75507.

(a) “Water year” means the period beginning October 1 of one calendar year and ending September 30 of the following calendar year.

(b) “Current water year” means the water year in which the investigation and report on the ground water conditions of the district is made, the hearing thereon held, and the determination is made by the board as to whether a zone or zones should be established and a ground water charge levied therein.

(c) “Preceding water year” means the water year immediately preceding the current water year.

(d) “Ensuing water year” means the water
 year immediately following the current water year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 401, Sec. 27.   (AB 1520)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75508.

“Agricultural water” means water first used on lands in the production of plant crops or livestock for market.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [75520. - 75524.]

75520.

The provisions of Articles 1 (commencing with Section 75560), 2 (commencing with Section 75570), and 3 (commencing with Section 75590) of Chapter 3 of this part apply only to districts in which a ground water charge is levied or proposed to be levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75521.

Ground water charges levied pursuant to this part are declared to be in furtherance of district activities in the protection and augmentation of the water supplies for users within the district or a zone or zones thereof which are necessary for the public health, welfare, and safety of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75522.

The ground water charges are authorized to be levied upon the production of ground water from all water-producing facilities, whether public or private, within the district or a zone or zones thereof for the benefit of all who rely directly or indirectly upon the ground water supplies of the district or a zone or zones thereof and water imported into the district or a zone or zones thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75523.

The proceeds of ground water charges levied and collected upon the production of water from ground water supplies within the district or a zone or zones thereof shall be used exclusively by the board for the district purposes authorized by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75524.

Any person or operator who augments the water supplies for use within the United Water Conservation District or a zone or zones thereof, by importing water from sources outside the district, and who stores that water in a basin within the district, may apply to the Board of Directors of the United Water Conservation District for a determination exempting that operator from the payment of any groundwater charge based upon the extraction of that water. The exemption shall be based upon the filing of an application for exemption and submission to the board of reasonable evidence of the following:

(a) The amount of water of acceptable quality imported into the district and spread or injected into a basin within the district.

(b) The portion of that imported water that effectively recharges the basin underlying the zone or zones into which it is injected or percolates.

(c) The amount of water produced by the applicant from the zone or zones overlying the areas effectively recharged by the importation and spreading or injection of that water.

(d) Even if the applicant had not imported and stored the water, it had a separate legal right and the ability to produce the quantity of water for which it seeks exemption, in addition to all other water produced by the applicant from the zone or zones involved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 684, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Establishment of Zones and Registration of Water-Measuring Devices [75540. - 75544.]

75540.

Prior to the establishment of any ground water charge, the board shall establish a zone or zones within the district within which the ground water charge will be effective. Such zone or zones shall be established and may be amended to the extent and in the manner prescribed in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 75560) of this part. A zone may include the entire district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75541.

Within six months after the date of establishing a zone or zones, all water-producing facilities located within the boundaries of such zone or zones shall be registered with the district and, if required by the board, shall be measured with a water-measuring device satisfactory to the district, which shall be installed by the district or, at the district’s option, by the operator thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75542.

Any new water-producing facility constructed or reestablished after the period prescribed in Section 75541 shall be registered with the district and, if required by the board, measured with a water-measuring device satisfactory to the district within 30 days after the completion or reestablishment thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75543.

Any water-measuring device required by and satisfactory to any other public agency, county, or district, or zone thereof, the boundaries of which substantially contain the area of the district, may be declared by the board to be sufficient compliance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75544.

The registration form for water-measuring devices shall contain all of the following:

(a) Information as to the owner or owners of the land upon which each water-producing facility is located.

(b) A general description and location of each water-producing facility.

(c) The name and address of the person charged with the operation of each water-producing facility.

(d) The name or names and addresses of all persons owning or claiming to own an interest in the water-producing facility.

(e) Such other information as the district determines is necessary and requires.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Procedure for Levy and Collection [75560. - 75638.]



  ARTICLE 1. Investigation and Report [75560. - 75561.]

75560.

The district shall annually cause to be made an engineering investigation and report upon ground water conditions of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75561.

The engineering investigation and report shall include all of the following:

(a) Information for the consideration of the board in its determination of the annual overdraft.

(b) Information for the consideration of the board in its determination of the accumulated overdraft as of the last day of the preceding water year.

(c) A report as to the total production of water from the ground water supplies of the district for the preceding water year.

(d) An estimate of the annual overdraft for the current water year and for the ensuing water year.

(e) The amount of water the district is obligated to purchase during the ensuing water year, and a recommendation as to the quantity of water needed for surface delivery and for replenishment of the ground water supplies of the district for the ensuing year.

(f) Such other information as the district desires.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Hearing [75570. - 75575.]

75570.

On or before the day of the regular meeting of the board in March of each year, the engineering investigation and report shall be delivered to the secretary in writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 255, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75571.

The secretary shall publish a notice of the receipt of the engineering investigation and report and of a public hearing thereon to be held in April. The notice shall be published, pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the district, at least 10 days prior to the date at which the public hearing is held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 255, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75572.

The notice, among other information which the district may provide therein, shall contain an invitation to all operators of water-producing facilities within the district to call at the office of the district to examine the engineering investigation and report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75573.

The board shall hold a public hearing in April of each year, in the regular meeting place of the board, not sooner than 30 days after receipt of the engineering investigation and report. Any operator of a water-producing facility within the district, or any person interested in the condition of the groundwater or surface water supplies of the district, may in person, or by representative, appear and submit evidence at the public hearing concerning the groundwater conditions and the surface water supplies of the district. Appearances also may be made supporting or protesting the engineering investigation and report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 255, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

75574.

The board shall, before the levy of the ground water charge, find and determine all of the following:

(a) The average annual overdraft for the immediate past 10 water years.

(b) The estimated annual overdraft for the current water year.

(c) The estimated annual overdraft for the ensuing water year.

(d) The accumulated overdraft as of the last day of the preceding water year. 

(e) The estimated accumulated overdraft as of the last day of the current water year.

(f) The estimated amount of agricultural water to be withdrawn from the ground water supplies of the district for the ensuing water year.

(g) The amount of water other than agricultural water to be drawn from the ground water supplies of the district for the ensuing water year.

(h) The estimated amount of water necessary for surface distribution for the ensuing water year.

(i) The amount of water which is necessary for the replenishment of the ground water supplies of the district.

(j) The amount of water the district is obligated by contract to purchase.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75575.

The findings and determinations by the board are conclusive and binding upon all persons and parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Levy [75590. - 75601.]

75590.

Prior to the end of the water year in which the hearing is held, and based upon the findings and determinations from the hearing, the board shall determine whether or not a zone or zones should be established and a ground water charge levied therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75591.

If the board determines that a zone or zones should be established and a ground water charge levied therein, it shall establish the zone or zones and levy, assess, and affix the charge against all persons operating ground water-producing facilities within the zone or zones during the current or ensuing water year. However, the board may waive any minimal charge, the collection of which is determined by the board not to result in net economic benefit to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1208, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

75592.

The charge shall be computed at a fixed and uniform rate per acre-foot for agricultural water, and at a fixed and uniform rate per acre-foot for all water other than agricultural water. However, a different fixed and uniform rate per acre-foot may be used to compute the charge for all water other than agricultural water used for irrigation purposes on parks, golf courses, schools, cemeteries, and publicly owned historical sites.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 718, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75593.

Different rates may be established in different zones; provided, however, that in each zone the rate for agricultural water shall be fixed and uniform and the rate for water other than agricultural water shall be fixed and uniform.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75594.

Except as provided in Section 75595, any ground water charge in any year shall be established at a fixed and uniform rate for each acre-foot for water other than agricultural water which is not less than three times nor more than five times the fixed and uniform rate established for agricultural water. However, any groundwater charge in any year for water other than agricultural water used for irrigation purposes on parks, golf courses, schools, cemeteries, and publicly owned historical sites may be established at a fixed and uniform rate for each acre-foot which shall not be less than the rate established for agricultural water, nor more than the rate established for all water other than agricultural water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 718, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

75595.

In any county which has a population of 503,000 or more and less than 600,000, any ground water charge in any year shall be established at a fixed and uniform rate for each acre-foot for water other than agricultural water in such proportion to the fixed and uniform rate established for agricultural water as the board shall determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75596.

Any ground water charge levied pursuant to this part shall be in addition to any general tax or assessment levied within the district or a zone or zones thereof; provided, that in any fiscal year, the sums raised by any ground water charge levied by the district in any zone or zones, shall not produce funds for district purposes that would exceed such amount as is deemed necessary by the district board to be used in furtherance of district purposes in the replenishment, augmentation, and the protection of water supplies for users within the district or a zone or zones thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 133.)
-------------------------------------------

75598.

In addition to the information required to be given to the board of supervisors and the auditor of each affected county pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 75350) of Part 8 of this division, the board shall at the same time annually furnish the board of supervisors and the auditor of each affected county the estimated sum of a ground water charge which the board intends to levy in any zone or zones.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75600.

Clerical errors occurring or appearing in the name of any person or in the description of the water-producing facility where the production of water therefrom is otherwise properly charged, or in the making or extension of any charge upon the records which do not affect the substantial rights of the assessee or assessees, shall not invalidate the ground water charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75601.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may amend the report prepared pursuant to Section 75561 at any time during the water year. Upon completion of any amended report, the board shall deliver the report to the secretary.

(b) The secretary shall publish a notice of the receipt of the amended report and of a public hearing. The notice shall be published pursuant to Section 75571.

(c) The board shall hold a public hearing within 30 days after the receipt of the amended report. Persons may appear and submit evidence at the public hearing concerning the groundwater conditions and the surface water supplies of the district. Any person may protest or support the amended report.

(d) The board may modify a groundwater charge levied pursuant to Section 75591 if, in the judgment of the board, based on the findings and determinations from the hearing held pursuant to subdivision (c), the modification is necessary.

(e) Any groundwater charge modified pursuant to subdivision (d) is subject to Sections 75592, 75593, 75594, 75595, and 75596.

(f) Upon the modification of the groundwater charge pursuant to subdivision (d), the board shall notify, in writing, the board of supervisors and the auditor of each county of the modification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1195, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Collection [75610. - 75624.]

75610.

The district, after the levying of the ground water charge, shall give notice thereof to each operator of each water-producing facility in the zone or zones as disclosed by the records of the district, which notice shall state the rate for each class of water of the ground water charge for each acre-foot of water to be produced during the ensuing water year. The notice may be sent by postal card or by other first-class mail and with postage prepaid by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75611.

After the establishment of a ground water charge, each operator of a water-producing facility within the affected zone or zones of the district, until such time as such water-producing facility has been permanently abandoned, shall file with the district, on or before the 31st day of January and on or before the 31st day of July in each year, a statement setting forth the total production in acre-feet of water for the preceding six-month period (excluding the month in which the statement is due), a general description or number locating each water-producing facility, and the method or basis of the computation, of such water production.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75612.

If no water has been produced from a water-producing facility during the preceding six-month period, a statement shall be filed with the district, setting forth that no water has been produced during such period. Such statement shall be verified by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury.
